Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1019
Conviction; order prohibiting ownership, possession, or residing with animal; duration; violation; penalty; seizure of animal.

(1)(a) If a person is convicted of a felony under section 28-1005 or 28-1009, the sentencing court shall order such person not to own, possess, or reside with any animal for at least five years after the date of conviction, but such time restriction shall not exceed fifteen years. Any person violating such court order shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(b) If a person is convicted of a Class I misdemeanor under section 28-1005.01 or 28-1009 or a Class III misdemeanor under section 28-1010, the sentencing court may order such person not to own, possess, or reside with any animal after the date of conviction, but such time restriction, if any, shall not exceed five years. Any person violating such court order shall be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor.

(c) Any animal involved in a violation of a court order under subdivision (a) or (b) of this subsection shall be subject to seizure by any law enforcement officer or animal control officer. Distribution or disposition shall be made under section 28-1012.01.

(2) This section shall not apply to any person convicted under section 28-1005, 28-1005.01, or 28-1009 if a licensed physician confirms in writing that ownership or possession of or residence with an animal is essential to the health of such person.

Laws 2008, LB1055, § 3;

Laws 2010, LB252, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB712, § 13;

Laws 2014, LB674, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB360, § 10;

Laws 2022, LB829, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB133, § 4.

If a person is convicted of a Class IV felony under section 28-1009, the sentencing court shall order such person not to own, possess, or reside with any animal for at least 5 years and no more than 15 years after the date of conviction. State v. Meduna, 18 Neb. App. 818, 794 N.W.2d 160 (2011).